Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5680.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 47328. A person shall not use any kind of a boat, tug, or launch, except when used in hook and line fishing, or any kind of net or nets, set hook lines, or commercial trolling rigs for the purpose of taking, catching, killing, or transporting fish in any of the waters bordering on this state, regardless of whether for commercial purposes or for personal use, without first having applied for and been issued a license for that activity, in accordance with this part. A license, except as otherwise provided by law, is not required of persons engaged in sport trolling in these waters, except that the owners of boats operated with either an inboard or outboard motor and offered for hire in sport trolling for lake trout shall obtain a license for each boat. A license, except as otherwise provided by law, is not required of persons engaged in taking fish with set lines in lake St. Clair as provided in section 47302. Sec. 47330. (1) The department, when application is made by any If a person submits an application in accordance with section 47329, the department shall issue the license provided for in this part upon payment by if the applicant , if a resident of this state, of pays the following fees: (a) For fishing with set hook lines or nets, with or without a boat not exceeding 16 feet in overall length, or a boat used in sport trolling for lake trout for hire, $16.00 per year. Any person using more than a single crew consisting of not more than 4 people in fishing nets or hooks under the ice shall secure a license for each crew member. The department, upon on proper application, shall issue with each license to fish nets or set hook lines under the ice 4 identification cards bearing the number of the license and the year for which the license was issued. Each member of a single crew engaged in the setting, lifting, or pulling of nets, set hook lines, or other devices, set under the ice under authority of the license, shall carry the card on his or her the member's person at all times while so engaged and upon demand of any conservation officer shall exhibit the card. Minnow seines and dip nets are exempt from this section. Â (b) For each rowboat, sailboat, powerboat, motorboat, steamboat, or scow used in catching, killing, taking, or transporting fish caught with nets, set hook lines, or trolling rigs, $3.00 per foot overall length, and $1.00 per ton additional for each ton over 10 gross tons. A license is not required for a scow used only in transporting nets. Each license for a boat propelled by sail, steam, gas, or other mechanical power entitles the licensee to operate a rowboat not exceeding 16 feet in overall length. Each rowboat shall must bear the same identification as the boat for which the license is issued and shall be used only while attending the boat. A resident person shall not pay less than $50.00 or more than $200.00 on any 1 boat in any 1 license year. Â (2) For a nonresident of this state, the fee shall be 5 times the fee required of a resident in accordance with the schedule prescribed in this section. A license under section 47329 shall must not be issued to a nonresident for fishing in Lake Erie and Lake Huron except at the discretion of the department. Â (3) For the purpose of this part, a nonresident is any person who has not actually resided in this state for 3 years immediately prior to before the date of application for a license, any person applying for a license for use of nets or a boat registered or of record at a port outside of the state, or any firm, company, copartnership, partnership, association, or corporation in which any of their stock, boats, nets, and fishing equipment has been owned by nonresident persons at any time during the 3 years immediately prior to before the date of application for a license.